Utah statutes.
77-28c-102.   Preamble.

PREAMBLE

Whereas: The Interstate Compact for the supervision of Parolees and Probationers was established in 1937, it is the earliest corrections "compact" established among the states and has not been amended since its adoption over 62 years ago;

Whereas: This compact is the only vehicle for the controlled movement of adult parolees and probationers across state lines, and it currently has jurisdiction over more than a quarter of a million offenders;

Whereas: The complexities of the compact have become more difficult to administer, and many jurisdictions have expanded supervision expectations to include currently unregulated practices such as victim input, victim notification requirements, and sex offender registration;

Whereas: After hearings, national surveys, and a detailed study by a task force appointed by the National Institute of Corrections, the overwhelming recommendation has been to amend the document to bring about an effective management capacity that addresses public safety concerns and offender accountability;

Whereas: Upon the adoption of this Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision, it is the intention of the legislature to repeal the previous Interstate Compact for the Supervision of Parolees and Probationers on the effective date of this Compact.



Enacted by Chapter 45, 2001 General Session

